District of Columbia statutes.
32-1012.01

Administrative actions.

When an administrative complaint is filed against any employer or other person alleged to have violated this subchapter, a hearing by an administrative law judge shall be scheduled following the same procedure and available for a violation of Chapter 13 of this title [§ 32-1301 et seq.].

History

Mar. 25, 1993, D.C. Law 9-248, § 13a
as added Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-157, § 3(j), 61 DCR 10157

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-240, March 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1332).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 2(c) of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-544, Dec. 29, 2014, 62 DCR 243, 20 STAT 4458).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-157, § 7, see § 4 of the Wage Theft Prevention Correction and Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-188, Oct. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 14224).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-157: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-157 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014, and that the act shall apply to violations occurring after October 1, 2014.